Utah statutes.
59-12-111.    Penalty for certain purchasers that fail to file a return or
pay a tax due -- Commission rulemaking authority.
A person shall pay a penalty as provided in Section 59-1-401, plus interest at
the rate and in the manner prescribed in Section 59-1-402, and all other
penalties and interest as provided by this title if the person:
(1)  does not hold:
(a)  a license under Section 59-12-106; or
(b)  a valid use tax registration certificate;
(2)  purchases tangible personal property subject to taxation under Subsection
59-12-103(1) for storage, use, or other consumption in this state; and
(3)  fails to file a return or pay the tax due as prescribed by the commission
by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act.
